Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB32.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 12 OF KRS CHAPTER
154 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) There is created in the Cabinet for Economic Development the Office of Outdoor
Recreation Industry. The office shall be headed by an executive director
appointed by the secretary pursuant to KRS 154.l0-050. The office shall:
(a) Serve as coordinator for Kentucky's outdoor industry matters, including
resource development and industry promotion, and to foster connections
between constituents, businesses, and communities that rely on Kentucky's
outdoor recreation economy;
(b) Make policy recommendations to the Governor and the Legislative
Research Commission on outdoor recreation industry matters, including
business issues unique to the outdoor recreation industry;
(c) Coordinate and support the outdoor recreation industry in Kentucky to
promote economic development, conservation, stewardship, education,
workforce training, and public health and wellness; and
(d) Address the chronic and systemic inequities that prevent underserved youth
and communities from engaging in meaningful outdoor recreation
experiences and career pathways in the outdoor recreation industry.
(2) The executive director shall be the administrative head and chief executive
officer. The secretary shall have authority to hire staff, contract for services,
expend funds, and operate the normal business activities of the office.
Section 2. KRS 12.020 (Effective until July 1, 2025) is amended to read as
follows:
Departments, program cabinets and their departments, and the respective major
administrative bodies that they include are enumerated in this section. It is not intended
Page 1 of 30
BR086200.100 - 862 - XXXX 2/5/2025 3:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 862
that this enumeration of administrative bodies be all-inclusive. Every authority, board,
bureau, interstate compact, commission, committee, conference, council, office, or any
other form of organization shall be included in or attached to the department or program
cabinet in which they are included or to which they are attached by statute or statutorily
authorized executive order; except in the case of the Personnel Board and where the
attached department or administrative body is headed by a constitutionally elected
officer, the attachment shall be solely for the purpose of dissemination of information and
coordination of activities and shall not include any authority over the functions,
personnel, funds, equipment, facilities, or records of the department or administrative
body.
I. Cabinet for General Government - Departments headed by elected officers:
(1) The Governor.
(2) Lieutenant Governor.
(3) Department of State.
(a) Secretary of State.
(b) Board of Elections.
(c) Registry of Election Finance.
(4) Department of Law.
(a) Attorney General.
(5) Department of the Treasury.
(a) Treasurer.
(6) Department of Agriculture.
(a) Commissioner of Agriculture.
(b) Agricultural Development Board.
(c) Kentucky Agricultural Finance Corporation.
(7) Auditor of Public Accounts.
(a) Commonwealth Office of the Ombudsman.
Page 2 of 30
BR086200.100 - 862 - XXXX 2/5/2025 3:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 862
II. Program cabinets headed by appointed officers:
(1) Justice and Public Safety Cabinet:
(a) Department of Kentucky State Police.
1. Office of Administrative Services.
a. Division of Operational Support.
b. Division of Management Services.
2. Office of Operations.
a. Division of West Troops.
b. Division of East Troops.
c. Division of Special Enforcement.
d. Division of Commercial Vehicle Enforcement.
3. Office of Technical Services.
a. Division of Forensic Sciences.
b. Division of Electronic Services.
c. Division of Records Management.
(b) Department of Criminal Justice Training.
(c) Department of Corrections.
(d) Department of Juvenile Justice.
(e) Office of the Secretary.
(f) Office of Drug Control Policy.
(g) Office of Legal Services.
(h) Office of the Kentucky State Medical Examiner.
(i) Parole Board.
(j) Kentucky State Corrections Commission.
(k) Office of Legislative and Intergovernmental Services.
(l) Office of Human Resource Management.
1. Division of Human Resource Administration.
Page 3 of 30
BR086200.100 - 862 - XXXX 2/5/2025 3:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 862
2. Division of Employee Management.
(m) Department of Public Advocacy.
(n) Office of Communications.
1. Information Technology Services Division.
(o) Office of Financial Management Services.
1. Division of Financial Management.
(p) Grants Management Division.
(2) Energy and Environment Cabinet:
(a) Office of the Secretary.
1. Office of Legislative and Intergovernmental Affairs.
2. Office of Legal Services.
a. Legal Division I.
b. Legal Division II.
3. Office of Administrative Hearings.
4. Office of Communication.
5. Mine Safety Review Commission.
6. Office of Kentucky Nature Preserves.
7. Kentucky Public Service Commission.
(b) Department for Environmental Protection.
1. Office of the Commissioner.
2. Division for Air Quality.
3. Division of Water.
4. Division of Environmental Program Support.
5. Division of Waste Management.
6. Division of Enforcement.
7. Division of Compliance Assistance.
(c) Department for Natural Resources.
Page 4 of 30
BR086200.100 - 862 - XXXX 2/5/2025 3:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 862
1. Office of the Commissioner.
2. Division of Mine Permits.
3. Division of Mine Reclamation and Enforcement.
4. Division of Abandoned Mine Lands.
5. Division of Oil and Gas.
6. Division of Mine Safety.
7. Division of Forestry.
8. Division of Conservation.
9. Office of the Reclamation Guaranty Fund.
(d) Office of Energy Policy.
1. Division of Energy Assistance.
(e) Office of Administrative Services.
1. Division of Human Resources Management.
2. Division of Financial Management.
3. Division of Information Services.
(3) Public Protection Cabinet.
(a) Office of the Secretary.
1. Office of Communications and Public Outreach.
2. Office of Legal Services.
a. Insurance Legal Division.
b. Charitable Gaming Legal Division.
c. Alcoholic Beverage Control Legal Division.
d. Housing, Buildings and Construction Legal Division.
e. Financial Institutions Legal Division.
f. Professional Licensing Legal Division.
3. Office of Administrative Hearings.
4. Office of Administrative Services.
Page 5 of 30
BR086200.100 - 862 - XXXX 2/5/2025 3:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 862
a. Division of Human Resources.
b. Division of Fiscal Responsibility.
(b) Office of Claims and Appeals.
1. Board of Tax Appeals.
2. Board of Claims.
3. Crime Victims Compensation Board.
(c) Kentucky Boxing and Wrestling Commission.
(d) Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control.
1. Division of Distilled Spirits.
2. Division of Malt Beverages.
3. Division of Enforcement.
(e) Department of Charitable Gaming.
1. Division of Licensing and Compliance.
2. Division of Enforcement.
(f) Department of Financial Institutions.
1. Division of Depository Institutions.
2. Division of Non-Depository Institutions.
3. Division of Securities.
(g) Department of Housing, Buildings and Construction.
1. Division of Fire Prevention.
2. Division of Plumbing.
3. Division of Heating, Ventilation, and Air Conditioning.
4. Division of Building Code Enforcement.
(h) Department of Insurance.
1. Division of Health and Life Insurance and Managed Care.
2. Division of Property and Casualty Insurance.
3. Division of Administrative Services.
Page 6 of 30
BR086200.100 - 862 - XXXX 2/5/2025 3:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 862
4. Division of Financial Standards and Examination.
5. Division of Licensing.
6. Division of Insurance Fraud Investigation.
7. Division of Consumer Protection.
(i) Department of Professional Licensing.
1. Real Estate Authority.
2. Division of Real Property Boards.
(4) Transportation Cabinet:
(a) Department of Highways.
1. Office of Project Development.
2. Office of Project Delivery and Preservation.
3. Office of Highway Safety.
4. Highway District Offices One through Twelve.
(b) Department of Vehicle Regulation.
(c) Department of Aviation.
(d) Department of Rural and Municipal Aid.
1. Office of Local Programs.
2. Office of Rural and Secondary Roads.
(e) Office of the Secretary.
1. Office of Public Affairs.
2. Office for Civil Rights and Small Business Development.
3. Office of Budget and Fiscal Management.
4. Office of Inspector General.
5. Secretary's Office of Safety.
(f) Office of Support Services.
(g) Office of Transportation Delivery.
(h) Office of Audits.
Page 7 of 30
BR086200.100 - 862 - XXXX 2/5/2025 3:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 862
(i) Office of Human Resource Management.
(j) Office of Information Technology.
(k) Office of Legal Services.
(5) Cabinet for Economic Development:
(a) Office of the Secretary.
1. Office of Legal Services.
2. Department for Business and Community Development.
a. Development and Retention Division – West Kentucky.
b. Development, Retention, and Administrative Division –
Central and East Kentucky.
c. Community and Workforce Development Division.
3. Department for Financial Services.
a. Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority.
b. Finance and Personnel Division.
c. IT and Resource Management Division.
d. Compliance Division.
e. Program Administration Division.
f. Bluegrass State Skills Corporation.
g. The GRANT Commission.
4. Office of Strategy and Public Affairs.
a. Marketing and Communications Division.
b. Research and Strategy Division.
5. Office of Entrepreneurship and Innovation.
a. Commission on Small Business Innovation and Advocacy.
6. Office of Outdoor Recreation Industry.
(6) Cabinet for Health and Family Services:
(a) Office of the Secretary.
Page 8 of 30
BR086200.100 - 862 - XXXX 2/5/2025 3:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 862
1. Office of Public Affairs.
2. Office of Legal Services.
3. Office of Inspector General.
4. Office of Human Resource Management.
5. Office of Finance and Budget.
6. Office of Legislative and Regulatory Affairs.
7. Office of Administrative Services.
8. Office of Application Technology Services.
9. Office of Data Analytics.
10. Office of Medical Cannabis.
a. Division of Enforcement and Compliance.
b. Division of Licensure and Access.
(b) Department for Public Health.
(c) Department for Medicaid Services.
(d) Department for Behavioral Health, Developmental and Intellectual
Disabilities.
(e) Department for Aging and Independent Living.
(f) Department for Community Based Services.
(g) Department for Income Support.
(h) Department for Family Resource Centers and Volunteer Services.
(7) Finance and Administration Cabinet:
(a) Office of the Secretary.
(b) Office of the Inspector General.
(c) Office of Legislative and Intergovernmental Affairs.
(d) Office of General Counsel.
(e) Office of the Controller.
(f) Office of Administrative Services.
Page 9 of 30
BR086200.100 - 862 - XXXX 2/5/2025 3:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 862
(g) Office of Policy and Audit.
(h) Department for Facilities and Support Services.
(i) Department of Revenue.
(j) Commonwealth Office of Technology.
(k) State Property and Buildings Commission.
(l) Office of Equal Employment Opportunity and Contract Compliance.
(m) Kentucky Employees Retirement Systems.
(n) Commonwealth Credit Union.
(o) State Investment Commission.
(p) Kentucky Housing Corporation.
(q) Kentucky Local Correctional Facilities Construction Authority.
(r) Kentucky Turnpike Authority.
(s) Historic Properties Advisory Commission.
(t) Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority.
(u) Kentucky River Authority.
(v) Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System Board of Trustees.
(w) Executive Branch Ethics Commission.
(x) Office of Fleet Management.
(8) Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet:
(a) Kentucky Department of Tourism.
1. Division of Tourism Services.
2. Division of Marketing and Administration.
3. Division of Communications and Promotions.
(b) Kentucky Department of Parks.
1. Division of Information Technology.
2. Division of Human Resources.
3. Division of Financial Operations.
Page 10 of 30
BR086200.100 - 862 - XXXX 2/5/2025 3:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 862
4. Division of Purchasing.
5. Division of Facilities.
6. Division of Park Operations.
7. Division of Sales, Marketing, and Customer Service.
8. Division of Engagement.
9. Division of Food Services.
10. Division of Rangers.
(c) Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources.
1. Division of Law Enforcement.
2. Division of Administrative Services.
3. Division of Engineering, Infrastructure, and Technology.
4. Division of Fisheries.
5. Division of Information and Education.
6. Division of Wildlife.
7. Division of Marketing.
(d) Kentucky Horse Park.
1. Division of Support Services.
2. Division of Buildings and Grounds.
3. Division of Operational Services.
(e) Kentucky State Fair Board.
1. Office of Administrative and Information Technology Services.
2. Office of Human Resources and Access Control.
3. Division of Expositions.
4. Division of Kentucky Exposition Center Operations.
5. Division of Kentucky International Convention Center.
6. Division of Public Relations and Media.
7. Division of Venue Services.
Page 11 of 30
BR086200.100 - 862 - XXXX 2/5/2025 3:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 862
8. Division of Personnel Management and Staff Development.
9. Division of Sales.
10. Division of Security and Traffic Control.
11. Division of Information Technology.
12. Division of the Louisville Arena.
13. Division of Fiscal and Contract Management.
14. Division of Access Control.
(f) Office of the Secretary.
1. Office of Finance.
2. Office of Government Relations and Administration.
(g) Office of Legal Affairs.
(h) Office of Human Resources.
(i) Office of Public Affairs and Constituent Services.
(j) Office of Arts and Cultural Heritage.
(k) Kentucky African-American Heritage Commission.
(l) Kentucky Foundation for the Arts.
(m) Kentucky Humanities Council.
(n) Kentucky Heritage Council.
(o) Kentucky Arts Council.
(p) Kentucky Historical Society.
1. Division of Museums.
2. Division of Oral History and Educational Outreach.
3. Division of Research and Publications.
4. Division of Administration.
(q) Kentucky Center for the Arts.
1. Division of Governor's School for the Arts.
(r) Kentucky Artisans Center at Berea.
Page 12 of 30
BR086200.100 - 862 - XXXX 2/5/2025 3:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 862
(s) Northern Kentucky Convention Center.
(t) Eastern Kentucky Exposition Center.
(9) Personnel Cabinet:
(a) Office of the Secretary.
(b) Department of Human Resources Administration.
(c) Office of Employee Relations.
(d) Kentucky Public Employees Deferred Compensation Authority.
(e) Office of Administrative Services.
(f) Office of Legal Services.
(g) Governmental Services Center.
(h) Department of Employee Insurance.
(i) Office of Diversity, Equality, and Training.
(j) Office of Public Affairs.
(10) Education and Labor Cabinet:
(a) Office of the Secretary.
1. Office of Legal Services.
a. Workplace Standards Legal Division.
b. Workers' Claims Legal Division.
c. Workforce Development Legal Division.
2. Office of Administrative Services.
a. Division of Human Resources Management.
b. Division of Fiscal Management.
c. Division of Operations and Support Services.
3. Office of Technology Services.
a. Division of Information Technology Services.
4. Office of Policy and Audit.
5. Office of Legislative Services.
Page 13 of 30
BR086200.100 - 862 - XXXX 2/5/2025 3:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 862
6. Office of Communications.
7. Office of the Kentucky Center for Statistics.
8. Board of the Kentucky Center for Statistics.
9. Early Childhood Advisory Council.
10. Governors' Scholars Program.
11. Governor's School for Entrepreneurs Program.
12. Foundation for Adult Education.
(b) Department of Education.
1. Kentucky Board of Education.
2. Kentucky Technical Education Personnel Board.
3. Education Professional Standards Board.
(c) Board of Directors for the Center for School Safety.
(d) Department for Libraries and Archives.
(e) Kentucky Environmental Education Council.
(f) Kentucky Educational Television.
(g) Kentucky Commission on the Deaf and Hard of Hearing.
(h) Department of Workforce Development.
1. Career Development Office.
2. Office of Vocational Rehabilitation.
a. Division of Kentucky Business Enterprise.
b. Division of the Carl D. Perkins Vocational Training Center.
c. Division of Blind Services.
d. Division of Field Services.
e. Statewide Council for Vocational Rehabilitation.
f. Employment First Council.
3. Office of Employer and Apprenticeship Services.
a. Division of Apprenticeship.
Page 14 of 30
BR086200.100 - 862 - XXXX 2/5/2025 3:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 862
4. Kentucky Apprenticeship Council.
5. Division of Technical Assistance.
6. Office of Adult Education.
7. Office of the Kentucky Workforce Innovation Board.
(i) Department of Workplace Standards.
1. Division of Occupational Safety and Health Compliance.
2. Division of Occupational Safety and Health Education and
Training.
3. Division of Wages and Hours.
(j) Office of Unemployment Insurance.
(k) Kentucky Unemployment Insurance Commission.
(l) Department of Workers' Claims.
1. Division of Workers' Compensation Funds.
2. Office of Administrative Law Judges.
3. Division of Claims Processing.
4. Division of Security and Compliance.
5. Division of Specialist and Medical Services.
6. Workers' Compensation Board.
(m) Workers' Compensation Funding Commission.
(n) Kentucky Occupational Safety and Health Standards Board.
(o) State Labor Relations Board.
(p) Employers' Mutual Insurance Authority.
(q) Kentucky Occupational Safety and Health Review Commission.
(r) Workers' Compensation Nominating Committee.
(s) Office of Educational Programs.
(t) Kentucky Workforce Innovation Board.
(u) Kentucky Commission on Proprietary Education.
Page 15 of 30
BR086200.100 - 862 - XXXX 2/5/2025 3:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 862
(v) Kentucky Work Ready Skills Advisory Committee.
(w) Kentucky Geographic Education Board.
(x) Disability Determination Services Program.
III. Other departments headed by appointed officers:
(1) Council on Postsecondary Education.
(2) Department of Military Affairs.
(3) Department for Local Government.
(4) Kentucky Commission on Human Rights.
(5) Kentucky Commission on Women.
(6) Department of Veterans' Affairs.
(7) Kentucky Commission on Military Affairs.
(8) Office of Minority Empowerment.
(9) Governor's Council on Wellness and Physical Activity.
(10) Kentucky Communications Network Authority.
Section 3. KRS 12.020 (Effective July 1, 2025) is amended to read as follows:
Departments, program cabinets and their departments, and the respective major
administrative bodies that they include are enumerated in this section. It is not intended
that this enumeration of administrative bodies be all-inclusive. Every authority, board,
bureau, interstate compact, commission, committee, conference, council, office, or any
other form of organization shall be included in or attached to the department or program
cabinet in which they are included or to which they are attached by statute or statutorily
authorized executive order; except in the case of the Personnel Board and where the
attached department or administrative body is headed by a constitutionally elected
officer, the attachment shall be solely for the purpose of dissemination of information and
coordination of activities and shall not include any authority over the functions,
personnel, funds, equipment, facilities, or records of the department or administrative
body.
Page 16 of 30
BR086200.100 - 862 - XXXX 2/5/2025 3:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 862
I. Cabinet for General Government - Departments headed by elected officers:
(1) The Governor.
(2) Lieutenant Governor.
(3) Department of State.
(a) Secretary of State.
(b) Board of Elections.
(c) Registry of Election Finance.
(4) Department of Law.
(a) Attorney General.
(5) Department of the Treasury.
(a) Treasurer.
(6) Department of Agriculture.
(a) Commissioner of Agriculture.
(b) Agricultural Development Board.
(c) Kentucky Agricultural Finance Corporation.
(7) Auditor of Public Accounts.
(a) Commonwealth Office of the Ombudsman.
II. Program cabinets headed by appointed officers:
(1) Justice and Public Safety Cabinet:
(a) Department of Kentucky State Police.
1. Office of Administrative Services.
a. Division of Operational Support.
b. Division of Management Services.
2. Office of Operations.
a. Division of West Troops.
b. Division of East Troops.
c. Division of Special Enforcement.
Page 17 of 30
BR086200.100 - 862 - XXXX 2/5/2025 3:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 862
d. Division of Commercial Vehicle Enforcement.
3. Office of Technical Services.
a. Division of Forensic Sciences.
b. Division of Electronic Services.
c. Division of Records Management.
(b) Department of Criminal Justice Training.
(c) Department of Corrections.
(d) Department of Juvenile Justice.
(e) Office of the Secretary.
(f) Office of Drug Control Policy.
(g) Office of Legal Services.
(h) Office of the Kentucky State Medical Examiner.
(i) Parole Board.
(j) Kentucky State Corrections Commission.
(k) Office of Legislative and Intergovernmental Services.
(l) Office of Human Resource Management.
1. Division of Human Resource Administration.
2. Division of Employee Management.
(m) Department of Public Advocacy.
(n) Office of Communications.
1. Information Technology Services Division.
(o) Office of Financial Management Services.
1. Division of Financial Management.
(p) Grants Management Division.
(2) Energy and Environment Cabinet:
(a) Office of the Secretary.
1. Office of Legislative and Intergovernmental Affairs.
Page 18 of 30
BR086200.100 - 862 - XXXX 2/5/2025 3:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 862
2. Office of Legal Services.
a. Legal Division I.
b. Legal Division II.
3. Office of Administrative Hearings.
4. Office of Communication.
5. Mine Safety Review Commission.
6. Office of Kentucky Nature Preserves.
7. Kentucky Public Service Commission.
(b) Department for Environmental Protection.
1. Office of the Commissioner.
2. Division for Air Quality.
3. Division of Water.
4. Division of Environmental Program Support.
5. Division of Waste Management.
6. Division of Enforcement.
7. Division of Compliance Assistance.
(c) Department for Natural Resources.
1. Office of the Commissioner.
2. Division of Mine Permits.
3. Division of Mine Reclamation and Enforcement.
4. Division of Abandoned Mine Lands.
5. Division of Oil and Gas.
6. Division of Mine Safety.
7. Division of Forestry.
8. Division of Conservation.
9. Office of the Reclamation Guaranty Fund.
(d) Office of Energy Policy.
Page 19 of 30
BR086200.100 - 862 - XXXX 2/5/2025 3:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 862
1. Division of Energy Assistance.
(e) Office of Administrative Services.
1. Division of Human Resources Management.
2. Division of Financial Management.
3. Division of Information Services.
(3) Public Protection Cabinet.
(a) Office of the Secretary.
1. Office of Communications and Public Outreach.
2. Office of Legal Services.
a. Insurance Legal Division.
b. Alcoholic Beverage Control Legal Division.
c. Housing, Buildings and Construction Legal Division.
d. Financial Institutions Legal Division.
e. Professional Licensing Legal Division.
3. Office of Administrative Hearings.
4. Office of Administrative Services.
a. Division of Human Resources.
b. Division of Fiscal Responsibility.
(b) Office of Claims and Appeals.
1. Board of Tax Appeals.
2. Board of Claims.
3. Crime Victims Compensation Board.
(c) Kentucky Boxing and Wrestling Commission.
(d) Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control.
1. Division of Distilled Spirits.
2. Division of Malt Beverages.
3. Division of Enforcement.
Page 20 of 30
BR086200.100 - 862 - XXXX 2/5/2025 3:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 862
(e) Department of Financial Institutions.
1. Division of Depository Institutions.
2. Division of Non-Depository Institutions.
3. Division of Securities.
(f) Department of Housing, Buildings and Construction.
1. Division of Fire Prevention.
2. Division of Plumbing.
3. Division of Heating, Ventilation, and Air Conditioning.
4. Division of Building Code Enforcement.
(g) Department of Insurance.
1. Division of Health and Life Insurance and Managed Care.
2. Division of Property and Casualty Insurance.
3. Division of Administrative Services.
4. Division of Financial Standards and Examination.
5. Division of Licensing.
6. Division of Insurance Fraud Investigation.
7. Division of Consumer Protection.
(h) Department of Professional Licensing.
1. Real Estate Authority.
2. Division of Real Property Boards.
(4) Transportation Cabinet:
(a) Department of Highways.
1. Office of Project Development.
2. Office of Project Delivery and Preservation.
3. Office of Highway Safety.
4. Highway District Offices One through Twelve.
(b) Department of Vehicle Regulation.
Page 21 of 30
BR086200.100 - 862 - XXXX 2/5/2025 3:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 862
(c) Department of Aviation.
(d) Department of Rural and Municipal Aid.
1. Office of Local Programs.
2. Office of Rural and Secondary Roads.
(e) Office of the Secretary.
1. Office of Public Affairs.
2. Office for Civil Rights and Small Business Development.
3. Office of Budget and Fiscal Management.
4. Office of Inspector General.
5. Secretary's Office of Safety.
(f) Office of Support Services.
(g) Office of Transportation Delivery.
(h) Office of Audits.
(i) Office of Human Resource Management.
(j) Office of Information Technology.
(k) Office of Legal Services.
(5) Cabinet for Economic Development:
(a) Office of the Secretary.
1. Office of Legal Services.
2. Department for Business and Community Development.
a. Development and Retention Division – West Kentucky.
b. Development, Retention, and Administrative Division –
Central and East Kentucky.
c. Community and Workforce Development Division.
3. Department for Financial Services.
a. Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority.
b. Finance and Personnel Division.
Page 22 of 30
BR086200.100 - 862 - XXXX 2/5/2025 3:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 862
c. IT and Resource Management Division.
d. Compliance Division.
e. Program Administration Division.
f. Bluegrass State Skills Corporation.
g. The GRANT Commission.
4. Office of Strategy and Public Affairs.
a. Marketing and Communications Division.
b. Research and Strategy Division.
5. Office of Entrepreneurship and Innovation.
a. Commission on Small Business Innovation and Advocacy.
6. Office of Outdoor Recreation Industry.
(6) Cabinet for Health and Family Services:
(a) Office of the Secretary.
1. Office of Public Affairs.
2. Office of Legal Services.
3. Office of Inspector General.
4. Office of Human Resource Management.
5. Office of Finance and Budget.
6. Office of Legislative and Regulatory Affairs.
7. Office of Administrative Services.
8. Office of Application Technology Services.
9. Office of Data Analytics.
10. Office of Medical Cannabis.
a. Division of Enforcement and Compliance.
b. Division of Licensure and Access.
(b) Department for Public Health.
(c) Department for Medicaid Services.
Page 23 of 30
BR086200.100 - 862 - XXXX 2/5/2025 3:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 862
(d) Department for Behavioral Health, Developmental and Intellectual
Disabilities.
(e) Department for Aging and Independent Living.
(f) Department for Community Based Services.
(g) Department for Family Resource Centers and Volunteer Services.
(7) Finance and Administration Cabinet:
(a) Office of the Secretary.
(b) Office of the Inspector General.
(c) Office of Legislative and Intergovernmental Affairs.
(d) Office of General Counsel.
(e) Office of the Controller.
(f) Office of Administrative Services.
(g) Office of Policy and Audit.
(h) Department for Facilities and Support Services.
(i) Department of Revenue.
(j) Commonwealth Office of Technology.
(k) State Property and Buildings Commission.
(l) Office of Equal Employment Opportunity and Contract Compliance.
(m) Kentucky Employees Retirement Systems.
(n) Commonwealth Credit Union.
(o) State Investment Commission.
(p) Kentucky Housing Corporation.
(q) Kentucky Local Correctional Facilities Construction Authority.
(r) Kentucky Turnpike Authority.
(s) Historic Properties Advisory Commission.
(t) Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority.
(u) Kentucky River Authority.
Page 24 of 30
BR086200.100 - 862 - XXXX 2/5/2025 3:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 862
(v) Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System Board of Trustees.
(w) Executive Branch Ethics Commission.
(x) Office of Fleet Management.
(8) Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet:
(a) Kentucky Department of Tourism.
1. Division of Tourism Services.
2. Division of Marketing and Administration.
3. Division of Communications and Promotions.
(b) Kentucky Department of Parks.
1. Division of Information Technology.
2. Division of Human Resources.
3. Division of Financial Operations.
4. Division of Purchasing.
5. Division of Facilities.
6. Division of Park Operations.
7. Division of Sales, Marketing, and Customer Service.
8. Division of Engagement.
9. Division of Food Services.
10. Division of Rangers.
(c) Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources.
1. Division of Law Enforcement.
2. Division of Administrative Services.
3. Division of Engineering, Infrastructure, and Technology.
4. Division of Fisheries.
5. Division of Information and Education.
6. Division of Wildlife.
7. Division of Marketing.
Page 25 of 30
BR086200.100 - 862 - XXXX 2/5/2025 3:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 862
(d) Kentucky Horse Park.
1. Division of Support Services.
2. Division of Buildings and Grounds.
3. Division of Operational Services.
(e) Kentucky State Fair Board.
1. Office of Administrative and Information Technology Services.
2. Office of Human Resources and Access Control.
3. Division of Expositions.
4. Division of Kentucky Exposition Center Operations.
5. Division of Kentucky International Convention Center.
6. Division of Public Relations and Media.
7. Division of Venue Services.
8. Division of Personnel Management and Staff Development.
9. Division of Sales.
10. Division of Security and Traffic Control.
11. Division of Information Technology.
12. Division of the Louisville Arena.
13. Division of Fiscal and Contract Management.
14. Division of Access Control.
(f) Office of the Secretary.
1. Office of Finance.
2. Office of Government Relations and Administration.
(g) Office of Legal Affairs.
(h) Office of Human Resources.
(i) Office of Public Affairs and Constituent Services.
(j) Office of Arts and Cultural Heritage.
(k) Kentucky African-American Heritage Commission.
Page 26 of 30
BR086200.100 - 862 - XXXX 2/5/2025 3:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 862
(l) Kentucky Foundation for the Arts.
(m) Kentucky Humanities Council.
(n) Kentucky Heritage Council.
(o) Kentucky Arts Council.
(p) Kentucky Historical Society.
1. Division of Museums.
2. Division of Oral History and Educational Outreach.
3. Division of Research and Publications.
4. Division of Administration.
(q) Kentucky Center for the Arts.
1. Division of Governor's School for the Arts.
(r) Kentucky Artisans Center at Berea.
(s) Northern Kentucky Convention Center.
(t) Eastern Kentucky Exposition Center.
(9) Personnel Cabinet:
(a) Office of the Secretary.
(b) Department of Human Resources Administration.
(c) Office of Employee Relations.
(d) Kentucky Public Employees Deferred Compensation Authority.
(e) Office of Administrative Services.
(f) Office of Legal Services.
(g) Governmental Services Center.
(h) Department of Employee Insurance.
(i) Office of Diversity, Equality, and Training.
(j) Office of Public Affairs.
(10) Education and Labor Cabinet:
(a) Office of the Secretary.
Page 27 of 30
BR086200.100 - 862 - XXXX 2/5/2025 3:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 862
1. Office of Legal Services.
a. Workplace Standards Legal Division.
b. Workers' Claims Legal Division.
c. Workforce Development Legal Division.
2. Office of Administrative Services.
a. Division of Human Resources Management.
b. Division of Fiscal Management.
c. Division of Operations and Support Services.
3. Office of Technology Services.
a. Division of Information Technology Services.
4. Office of Policy and Audit.
5. Office of Legislative Services.
6. Office of Communications.
7. Office of the Kentucky Center for Statistics.
8. Board of the Kentucky Center for Statistics.
9. Early Childhood Advisory Council.
10. Governors' Scholars Program.
11. Governor's School for Entrepreneurs Program.
12. Foundation for Adult Education.
(b) Department of Education.
1. Kentucky Board of Education.
2. Kentucky Technical Education Personnel Board.
3. Education Professional Standards Board.
(c) Board of Directors for the Center for School Safety.
(d) Department for Libraries and Archives.
(e) Kentucky Environmental Education Council.
(f) Kentucky Educational Television.
Page 28 of 30
BR086200.100 - 862 - XXXX 2/5/2025 3:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 862
(g) Kentucky Commission on the Deaf and Hard of Hearing.
(h) Department of Workforce Development.
1. Career Development Office.
2. Office of Vocational Rehabilitation.
a. Division of Kentucky Business Enterprise.
b. Division of the Carl D. Perkins Vocational Training Center.
c. Division of Blind Services.
d. Division of Field Services.
e. Statewide Council for Vocational Rehabilitation.
f. Employment First Council.
3. Office of Employer and Apprenticeship Services.
a. Division of Apprenticeship.
4. Kentucky Apprenticeship Council.
5. Division of Technical Assistance.
6. Office of Adult Education.
7. Office of the Kentucky Workforce Innovation Board.
(i) Department of Workplace Standards.
1. Division of Occupational Safety and Health Compliance.
2. Division of Occupational Safety and Health Education and
Training.
3. Division of Wages and Hours.
(j) Office of Unemployment Insurance.
(k) Kentucky Unemployment Insurance Commission.
(l) Department of Workers' Claims.
1. Division of Workers' Compensation Funds.
2. Office of Administrative Law Judges.
3. Division of Claims Processing.
Page 29 of 30
BR086200.100 - 862 - XXXX 2/5/2025 3:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 862
4. Division of Security and Compliance.
5. Division of Specialist and Medical Services.
6. Workers' Compensation Board.
(m) Workers' Compensation Funding Commission.
(n) Kentucky Occupational Safety and Health Standards Board.
(o) State Labor Relations Board.
(p) Employers' Mutual Insurance Authority.
(q) Kentucky Occupational Safety and Health Review Commission.
(r) Workers' Compensation Nominating Committee.
(s) Office of Educational Programs.
(t) Kentucky Workforce Innovation Board.
(u) Kentucky Commission on Proprietary Education.
(v) Kentucky Work Ready Skills Advisory Committee.
(w) Kentucky Geographic Education Board.
(x) Disability Determination Services Program.
III. Other departments headed by appointed officers:
(1) Council on Postsecondary Education.
(2) Department of Military Affairs.
(3) Department for Local Government.
(4) Kentucky Commission on Human Rights.
(5) Kentucky Commission on Women.
(6) Department of Veterans' Affairs.
(7) Kentucky Commission on Military Affairs.
(8) Office of Minority Empowerment.
(9) Governor's Council on Wellness and Physical Activity.
(10) Kentucky Communications Network Authority.
Page 30 of 30
BR086200.100 - 862 - XXXX 2/5/2025 3:02 PM Jacketed